Utah statutes.
17-38-2.   Operation and maintenance of zoo -- Advisory board -- Contract for services.

Upon the establishment of a county zoo under this act, the county legislative body may provide rules and regulations for its governance and operation, including the establishment of an advisory board. The county executive may contract with an agency or vendor to supply all or part of the services necessary for the operation and maintenance of a county zoo.



Amended by Chapter 227, 1993 General Session

